Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 3. Pleadings; Parties and Causes of Action

§§ 1071-1075.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 1076.
Release of claim for personal injury or death—disavowal of agreement.

An agreement entered into by a person or his or her legal representative within 15 days after personal injury to him or her or his or her death or personal injury or death of his or her spouse or child, which may adversely affect his or her estate’s right to compensation for the personal injury or death, may be disavowed by such person or his or her legal representative within three years after making the agreement. When such an agreement has been disavowed, it may not be used in whole or in part in any subsequent proceeding.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 269

, § 1, eff. Aug. 1, 1961.

§ 1077.
Tender of compensation.

When an agreement is disavowed, the claimant or his or her legal representative shall tender any consideration received to the person who paid or delivered the same.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 269

, § 2, eff. Aug. 1, 1961.